Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4300.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 7 of chapter 339 of the acts of 1925 is hereby amended by striking
out the second paragraph, added by chapter 116 of the acts of 1993, and inserting in place thereof
the following paragraph: -
Said district shall pay to the city of Salem an annual payment in lieu of taxes for all lands,
facilities and other property of said district within said city in accordance with the following
schedule: on July first, two thousand twenty-five the sum of six hundred thousand dollars; on
July first, two thousand twenty-six the sum of seven hundred thousand dollars; on July first, two
thousand twenty-seven the sum of eight hundred thousand dollars; on July first, two thousand
twenty-eight the sum of nine hundred thousand dollars; on July first, two thousand twenty-nine
the sum of one million dollars. Thereafter, on July first, commencing in two thousand thirty, the
annual payment in lieu of tax payment to the city of Salem shall increase by the prior year’s
average increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers in the Boston area, but
of 2

in no event less than two percent over and above the prior year payment. Such annual payments
shall be assessed by the district against, and such assessment shall be paid by, all members of the
district with the exception of the city of Salem, such payments to be apportioned among such
members in the same ration as the yearly flow of sewage each such member bears to the yearly
combined flow of sewage of the district.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect as of the first day of July, two thousand twenty-
five.
of 2